inc/flattened/verb_suffixes_flattened_glossing.lexc
@D.Person@@P.3Num.Pl@+VTA+Cnj+ThmDir+Neg+2+Pl+3:@D.Person@@P.3Num.Pl@m%>%>aa%>%>siw%>%>egw4 #;
@D.Person@@P.3Num.Pl@+VTA+Cnj+ThmDir+Neg+2+Pl+3+Dub:@D.Person@@P.3Num.Pl@m%>%>aa%>%>siiw%>%>eg%>%>eny1 #;
@D.Person@@P.3Num.Pl@+VTA+Cnj+ThmDir+Neg+2+Pl+3+Prt:@D.Person@@P.3Num.Pl@m%>%>aa%>%>siw%>%>ego%>b1an2i1 #;
@D.Person@@P.3Num.Pl@+VTA+Cnj+ThmDir+Neg+2+Pl+3+Prt+Dub:@D.Person@@P.3Num.Pl@m%>%>aa%>%>siiw%>%>egi%>b1an2eny1 #;
@D.Person@@P.3Num.Pl@+VTA+Cnj+ThmDir+Neg+3+Pl:@D.Person@@P.3Num.Pl@m%>%>aa%>%>sig%>%>waa #;
@D.Person@@P.3Num.Pl@+VTA+Cnj+ThmDir+Neg+3+Pl+Dub:@D.Person@@P.3Num.Pl@m%>%>aa%>%>sii%>%>gwaaw4%>%>eny1 #;
@D.Person@@P.3Num.Pl@+VTA+Cnj+ThmDir+Neg+3+Pl+Prt:@D.Person@@P.3Num.Pl@m%>%>aa%>%>sii%>%>waap%>an2i1 #;
@D.Person@@P.3Num.Pl@+VTA+Cnj+ThmDir+Neg+3+Pl+Prt+Dub:@D.Person@@P.3Num.Pl@m%>%>aa%>%>sii%>%>gwaao%>b1an2eny1 #;
@D.Person@@P.3Num.Pl@+VTA+Cnj+ThmInv+3+Pl:@D.Person@@P.3Num.Pl@m%>%>igo%>%>waad1y1 #;
@D.Person@@P.3Num.Pl@+VTA+Cnj+ThmInv+3+Pl+Dub:@D.Person@@P.3Num.Pl@m%>%>igo%>%>waag%>%>w4%>%>eny1 #;
@D.Person@@P.3Num.Pl@+VTA+Cnj+ThmInv+3+Pl+Prt:@D.Person@@P.3Num.Pl@m%>%>igo%>%>waap%>an2i1 #;
@D.Person@@P.3Num.Pl@+VTA+Cnj+ThmInv+3+Pl+Prt+Dub:@D.Person@@P.3Num.Pl@m%>%>igo%>%>waag%>%>o%>b1an2eny1 #;
@D.Person@@P.3Num.Pl@+VTA+Cnj+ThmInv+Neg+2+Pl+3:@D.Person@@P.3Num.Pl@m%>%>igo%>%>siw%>%>eg #;
@D.Person@@P.3Num.Pl@+VTA+Cnj+ThmInv+Neg+2+Pl+3+Dub:@D.Person@@P.3Num.Pl@m%>%>igo%>%>siiw%>%>egw4%>%>eny1 #;
@D.Person@@P.3Num.Pl@+VTA+Cnj+ThmInv+Neg+2+Pl+3+Prt:@D.Person@@P.3Num.Pl@m%>%>igo%>%>siw%>%>egi%>b1an2i1 #;
@D.Person@@P.3Num.Pl@+VTA+Cnj+ThmInv+Neg+2+Pl+3+Prt+Dub:@D.Person@@P.3Num.Pl@m%>%>igo%>%>siiw%>%>ego%>b1an2eny1 #;
@D.Person@@P.3Num.Pl@+VTA+Cnj+ThmInv+Neg+3:@D.Person@@P.3Num.Pl@m%>%>igo%>%>sigw4 #;
@D.Person@@P.3Num.Pl@+VTA+Cnj+ThmInv+Neg+3+Dub:@D.Person@@P.3Num.Pl@m%>%>igo%>%>siigw4%>%>eny1 #;
@D.Person@@P.3Num.Pl@+VTA+Cnj+ThmInv+Neg+3+Prt:@D.Person@@P.3Num.Pl@m%>%>igo%>%>sigo%>b1an2i1 #;
@D.Person@@P.3Num.Pl@+VTA+Cnj+ThmInv+Neg+3+Prt+Dub:@D.Person@@P.3Num.Pl@m%>%>igo%>%>siigo%>b1an2eny1 #;
@D.Person@@P.3Num.Pl@+VTA+Cnj+ThmNul+1+3:@D.Person@@P.3Num.Pl@m%>%>agw4 #;
@D.Person@@P.3Num.Pl@+VTA+Cnj+ThmNul+1+3+Dub:@D.Person@@P.3Num.Pl@m%>%>aaw%>%>ag%>%>eny1 #;
@D.Person@@P.3Num.Pl@+VTA+Cnj+ThmNul+1+3+Prt:@D.Person@@P.3Num.Pl@m%>%>ago%>b1an2i1 #;
@D.Person@@P.3Num.Pl@+VTA+Cnj+ThmNul+1+3+Prt+Dub:@D.Person@@P.3Num.Pl@m%>%>aaw%>%>agi%>b1an2eny1 #;
@D.Person@@P.3Num.Pl@+VTA+Cnj+ThmNul+1+Pl+3:@D.Person@@P.3Num.Pl@m%>%>angi%>%>d #;
@D.Person@@P.3Num.Pl@+VTA+Cnj+ThmNul+1+Pl+3+Dub:@D.Person@@P.3Num.Pl@m%>%>aaw%>%>angi%>%>d%>%>eny1 #;
@D.Person@@P.3Num.Pl@+VTA+Cnj+ThmNul+1+Pl+3+Prt:@D.Person@@P.3Num.Pl@m%>%>angi%>%>di%>b1an2i1 #;
@D.Person@@P.3Num.Pl@+VTA+Cnj+ThmNul+1+Pl+3+Prt+Dub:@D.Person@@P.3Num.Pl@m%>%>aaw%>%>angi%>%>di%>b1an2eny1 #;
@D.Person@@P.3Num.Pl@+VTA+Cnj+ThmNul+2+1+Pl+3:@D.Person@@P.3Num.Pl@m%>%>ang #;
@D.Person@@P.3Num.Pl@+VTA+Cnj+ThmNul+2+1+Pl+3+Dub:@D.Person@@P.3Num.Pl@m%>%>aaw%>%>angw4%>%>eny1 #;
@D.Person@@P.3Num.Pl@+VTA+Cnj+ThmNul+2+1+Pl+3+Prt:@D.Person@@P.3Num.Pl@m%>%>angi%>b1an2i1 #;
@D.Person@@P.3Num.Pl@+VTA+Cnj+ThmNul+2+1+Pl+3+Prt+Dub:@D.Person@@P.3Num.Pl@m%>%>aaw%>%>ango%>b1an2eny1 #;
@D.Person@@P.3Num.Pl@+VTA+Cnj+ThmNul+2+3:@D.Person@@P.3Num.Pl@m%>%>a%>%>d #;
@D.Person@@P.3Num.Pl@+VTA+Cnj+ThmNul+2+3+Dub:@D.Person@@P.3Num.Pl@m%>%>aaw%>%>a%>%>d%>%>eny1 #;
@D.Person@@P.3Num.Pl@+VTA+Cnj+ThmNul+2+3+Prt:@D.Person@@P.3Num.Pl@m%>%>a%>%>di%>b1an2i1 #;
@D.Person@@P.3Num.Pl@+VTA+Cnj+ThmNul+2+3+Prt+Dub:@D.Person@@P.3Num.Pl@m%>%>aaw%>%>a%>%>di%>b1an2eny1 #;
@D.Person@@P.3Num.Pl@+VTA+Cnj+ThmNul+2+Pl+3:@D.Person@@P.3Num.Pl@m%>%>egw4 #;
@D.Person@@P.3Num.Pl@+VTA+Cnj+ThmNul+2+Pl+3+Dub:@D.Person@@P.3Num.Pl@m%>%>aaw%>%>egw4%>%>eny1 #;
@D.Person@@P.3Num.Pl@+VTA+Cnj+ThmNul+2+Pl+3+Prt:@D.Person@@P.3Num.Pl@m%>%>ego%>b1an2i1 #;
@D.Person@@P.3Num.Pl@+VTA+Cnj+ThmNul+2+Pl+3+Prt+Dub:@D.Person@@P.3Num.Pl@m%>%>aaw%>%>ego%>b1an2eny1 #;
@D.Person@@P.Passive.1@@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+ThmPas+1+Pl+Dub:@D.Person@@P.Passive.1@@D.Person@m%>%>igooc1%>%>w4%>aang%>en2 #;
@D.Person@@P.Passive.1@@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+ThmPas+1+Pl+Prt+Dub:@D.Person@@P.Passive.1@@D.Person@m%>%>igooc1%>%>w4%>aangi%>b1an2%>en2 #;
@D.Person@@P.Passive.1@@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+ThmPas+1+Prt+Dub:@D.Person@@P.Passive.1@@D.Person@m%>%>igooc1%>%>w4%>aam%>b1aan2%>en2 #;
@D.Person@@P.Passive.1@@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+ThmPas+2+1+Pl+Dub:@D.Person@@P.Passive.1@@D.Person@m%>%>igooc1%>%>w4%>angw%>en2 #;
@D.Person@@P.Passive.1@@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+ThmPas+2+1+Pl+Prt+Dub:@D.Person@@P.Passive.1@@D.Person@m%>%>igooc1%>%>w4%>ango%>b1an2%>en2 #;
@D.Person@@P.Passive.1@@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+ThmPas+2+Dub:@D.Person@@P.Passive.1@@D.Person@m%>%>igooc1%>%>w4%>an%>en2 #;
@D.Person@@P.Passive.1@@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+ThmPas+2+Pl+Dub:@D.Person@@P.Passive.1@@D.Person@m%>%>igooc1%>%>w4%>egw%>en2 #;
@D.Person@@P.Passive.1@@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+ThmPas+2+Pl+Prt+Dub:@D.Person@@P.Passive.1@@D.Person@m%>%>igooc1%>%>w4%>ego%>b1an2%>en2 #;
@D.Person@@P.Passive.1@@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+ThmPas+2+Prt+Dub:@D.Person@@P.Passive.1@@D.Person@m%>%>igooc1%>%>w4%>am%>b1an2%>en2 #;
@D.Person@@P.Passive.1@@D.Person@@D.Mode.Dub@+VTA+Cnj+ThmPas+1+Pl+Prt:@D.Person@@P.Passive.1@@D.Person@@D.Mode.Dub@m%>%>igooc1%>aangi%>b1an2%>%>i1 #;
@D.Person@@P.Passive.1@@D.Person@@D.Mode.Dub@+VTA+Cnj+ThmPas+1+Prt:@D.Person@@P.Passive.1@@D.Person@@D.Mode.Dub@m%>%>igooc1%>aam%>b1aan2%>%>h #;
@D.Person@@P.Passive.1@@D.Person@@D.Mode.Dub@+VTA+Cnj+ThmPas+2+1+Pl+Prt:@D.Person@@P.Passive.1@@D.Person@@D.Mode.Dub@m%>%>igooc1%>ango%>b1an2%>%>i1 #;
@D.Person@@P.Passive.1@@D.Person@@D.Mode.Dub@+VTA+Cnj+ThmPas+2+Pl+Prt:@D.Person@@P.Passive.1@@D.Person@@D.Mode.Dub@m%>%>igooc1%>ego%>b1an2%>%>i1 #;
@D.Person@@P.Passive.1@@D.Person@@D.Mode.Dub@+VTA+Cnj+ThmPas+2+Prt:@D.Person@@P.Passive.1@@D.Person@@D.Mode.Dub@m%>%>igooc1%>am%>b1an2%>%>i1 #;
@D.Person@@P.Passive.1@@D.Person@@D.Mode@+VTA+Cnj+ThmPas+1+Pl:@D.Person@@P.Passive.1@@D.Person@@D.Mode@m%>%>igooc1%>aang #;
@D.Person@@P.Passive.1@@D.Person@@D.Mode@+VTA+Cnj+ThmPas+2:@D.Person@@P.Passive.1@@D.Person@@D.Mode@m%>%>igooc1%>an #;
@D.Person@@P.Passive.1@@D.Person@@D.Mode@+VTA+Cnj+ThmPas+2+1+Pl:@D.Person@@P.Passive.1@@D.Person@@D.Mode@m%>%>igooc1%>angw #;
@D.Person@@P.Passive.1@@D.Person@@D.Mode@+VTA+Cnj+ThmPas+2+Pl:@D.Person@@P.Passive.1@@D.Person@@D.Mode@m%>%>igooc1%>egw #;
@D.Person@@P.Passive.1@@D.Person@@D.Mode@@D.Mode.Dub@+VTA+Cnj+ThmPas+1:@D.Person@@P.Passive.1@@D.Person@@D.Mode@@D.Mode.Dub@m%>%>igooc1%>aan%>%>h #;
@D.Person@@P.Passive.1@@D.Person@@P.Mode.Dub@@R.Mode@+VTA+Cnj+ThmPas+1+Dub:@D.Person@@P.Passive.1@@D.Person@@P.Mode.Dub@@R.Mode@m%>%>igooc1%>%>w4%>aan%>en2 #;
@D.Person@@P.Passive.1@@P.Negation.1@@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+ThmPas+Neg+1+Pl+Dub:@D.Person@@P.Passive.1@@P.Negation.1@@D.Person@m%>%>igooc1%>si%>%>w4%>aang%>en2 #;
@D.Person@@P.Passive.1@@P.Negation.1@@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+ThmPas+Neg+1+Pl+Prt+Dub:@D.Person@@P.Passive.1@@P.Negation.1@@D.Person@m%>%>igooc1%>si%>%>w4%>aangi%>b1an2%>en2 #;
@D.Person@@P.Passive.1@@P.Negation.1@@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+ThmPas+Neg+1+Prt+Dub:@D.Person@@P.Passive.1@@P.Negation.1@@D.Person@m%>%>igooc1%>si%>%>w4%>aam%>b1aan2%>en2 #;
@D.Person@@P.Passive.1@@P.Negation.1@@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+ThmPas+Neg+2+1+Pl+Dub:@D.Person@@P.Passive.1@@P.Negation.1@@D.Person@m%>%>igooc1%>si%>%>w4%>angw%>en2 #;
@D.Person@@P.Passive.1@@P.Negation.1@@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+ThmPas+Neg+2+1+Pl+Prt+Dub:@D.Person@@P.Passive.1@@P.Negation.1@@D.Person@m%>%>igooc1%>si%>%>w4%>ango%>b1an2%>en2 #;
@D.Person@@P.Passive.1@@P.Negation.1@@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+ThmPas+Neg+2+Dub:@D.Person@@P.Passive.1@@P.Negation.1@@D.Person@m%>%>igooc1%>si%>%>w4%>an%>en2 #;
@D.Person@@P.Passive.1@@P.Negation.1@@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+ThmPas+Neg+2+Pl+Dub:@D.Person@@P.Passive.1@@P.Negation.1@@D.Person@m%>%>igooc1%>si%>%>w4%>egw%>en2 #;
@D.Person@@P.Passive.1@@P.Negation.1@@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+ThmPas+Neg+2+Pl+Prt+Dub:@D.Person@@P.Passive.1@@P.Negation.1@@D.Person@m%>%>igooc1%>si%>%>w4%>ego%>b1an2%>en2 #;
@D.Person@@P.Passive.1@@P.Negation.1@@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+ThmPas+Neg+2+Prt+Dub:@D.Person@@P.Passive.1@@P.Negation.1@@D.Person@m%>%>igooc1%>si%>%>w4%>am%>b1an2%>en2 #;
@D.Person@@P.Passive.1@@P.Negation.1@@D.Person@@D.Mode.Dub@+VTA+Cnj+ThmPas+Neg+1+Pl+Prt:@D.Person@@P.Passive.1@@P.Negation.1@@D.Person@@D.Mode.Dub@m%>%>igooc1%>siw%>aangi%>b1an2%>%>i1 #;
@D.Person@@P.Passive.1@@P.Negation.1@@D.Person@@D.Mode.Dub@+VTA+Cnj+ThmPas+Neg+1+Prt:@D.Person@@P.Passive.1@@P.Negation.1@@D.Person@@D.Mode.Dub@m%>%>igooc1%>siw%>aam%>b1aan2%>%>h #;
@D.Person@@P.Passive.1@@P.Negation.1@@D.Person@@D.Mode.Dub@+VTA+Cnj+ThmPas+Neg+2+1+Pl+Prt:@D.Person@@P.Passive.1@@P.Negation.1@@D.Person@@D.Mode.Dub@m%>%>igooc1%>siw%>ango%>b1an2%>%>i1 #;
@D.Person@@P.Passive.1@@P.Negation.1@@D.Person@@D.Mode.Dub@+VTA+Cnj+ThmPas+Neg+2+Pl+Prt:@D.Person@@P.Passive.1@@P.Negation.1@@D.Person@@D.Mode.Dub@m%>%>igooc1%>siw%>ego%>b1an2%>%>i1 #;
@D.Person@@P.Passive.1@@P.Negation.1@@D.Person@@D.Mode.Dub@+VTA+Cnj+ThmPas+Neg+2+Prt:@D.Person@@P.Passive.1@@P.Negation.1@@D.Person@@D.Mode.Dub@m%>%>igooc1%>siw%>am%>b1an2%>%>i1 #;
@D.Person@@P.Passive.1@@P.Negation.1@@D.Person@@D.Mode@+VTA+Cnj+ThmPas+Neg+1+Pl:@D.Person@@P.Passive.1@@P.Negation.1@@D.Person@@D.Mode@m%>%>igooc1%>siw%>aang #;
@D.Person@@P.Passive.1@@P.Negation.1@@D.Person@@D.Mode@+VTA+Cnj+ThmPas+Neg+2:@D.Person@@P.Passive.1@@P.Negation.1@@D.Person@@D.Mode@m%>%>igooc1%>siw%>an #;
@D.Person@@P.Passive.1@@P.Negation.1@@D.Person@@D.Mode@+VTA+Cnj+ThmPas+Neg+2+1+Pl:@D.Person@@P.Passive.1@@P.Negation.1@@D.Person@@D.Mode@m%>%>igooc1%>siw%>angw #;
@D.Person@@P.Passive.1@@P.Negation.1@@D.Person@@D.Mode@+VTA+Cnj+ThmPas+Neg+2+Pl:@D.Person@@P.Passive.1@@P.Negation.1@@D.Person@@D.Mode@m%>%>igooc1%>siw%>egw #;
@D.Person@@P.Passive.1@@P.Negation.1@@D.Person@@D.Mode@@D.Mode.Dub@+VTA+Cnj+ThmPas+Neg+1:@D.Person@@P.Passive.1@@P.Negation.1@@D.Person@@D.Mode@@D.Mode.Dub@m%>%>igooc1%>siw%>aan%>%>h #;
@D.Person@@P.Passive.1@@P.Negation.1@@D.Person@@P.Mode.Dub@@R.Mode@+VTA+Cnj+ThmPas+Neg+1+Dub:@D.Person@@P.Passive.1@@P.Negation.1@@D.Person@@P.Mode.Dub@@R.Mode@m%>%>igooc1%>si%>%>w4%>aan%>en2 #;
@D.Person@@P.Passive.1@@P.Negation.1@@P.Mode.Yes@@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+ThmPas+Neg+1+Pl+Dub:@D.Person@@P.Passive.1@@P.Negation.1@@P.Mode.Yes@@D.Person@m%>%>igooc1%>sii%>%>w4%>aang%>en2 #;
@D.Person@@P.Passive.1@@P.Negation.1@@P.Mode.Yes@@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+ThmPas+Neg+1+Pl+Prt+Dub:@D.Person@@P.Passive.1@@P.Negation.1@@P.Mode.Yes@@D.Person@m%>%>igooc1%>sii%>%>w4%>aangi%>b1an2%>en2 #;
@D.Person@@P.Passive.1@@P.Negation.1@@P.Mode.Yes@@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+ThmPas+Neg+1+Prt+Dub:@D.Person@@P.Passive.1@@P.Negation.1@@P.Mode.Yes@@D.Person@m%>%>igooc1%>sii%>%>w4%>aam%>b1aan2%>en2 #;
@D.Person@@P.Passive.1@@P.Negation.1@@P.Mode.Yes@@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+ThmPas+Neg+2+1+Pl+Dub:@D.Person@@P.Passive.1@@P.Negation.1@@P.Mode.Yes@@D.Person@m%>%>igooc1%>sii%>%>w4%>angw%>en2 #;
@D.Person@@P.Passive.1@@P.Negation.1@@P.Mode.Yes@@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+ThmPas+Neg+2+1+Pl+Prt+Dub:@D.Person@@P.Passive.1@@P.Negation.1@@P.Mode.Yes@@D.Person@m%>%>igooc1%>sii%>%>w4%>ango%>b1an2%>en2 #;
@D.Person@@P.Passive.1@@P.Negation.1@@P.Mode.Yes@@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+ThmPas+Neg+2+Dub:@D.Person@@P.Passive.1@@P.Negation.1@@P.Mode.Yes@@D.Person@m%>%>igooc1%>sii%>%>w4%>an%>en2 #;
@D.Person@@P.Passive.1@@P.Negation.1@@P.Mode.Yes@@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+ThmPas+Neg+2+Pl+Dub:@D.Person@@P.Passive.1@@P.Negation.1@@P.Mode.Yes@@D.Person@m%>%>igooc1%>sii%>%>w4%>egw%>en2 #;
@D.Person@@P.Passive.1@@P.Negation.1@@P.Mode.Yes@@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+ThmPas+Neg+2+Pl+Prt+Dub:@D.Person@@P.Passive.1@@P.Negation.1@@P.Mode.Yes@@D.Person@m%>%>igooc1%>sii%>%>w4%>ego%>b1an2%>en2 #;
@D.Person@@P.Passive.1@@P.Negation.1@@P.Mode.Yes@@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+ThmPas+Neg+2+Prt+Dub:@D.Person@@P.Passive.1@@P.Negation.1@@P.Mode.Yes@@D.Person@m%>%>igooc1%>sii%>%>w4%>am%>b1an2%>en2 #;
@D.Person@@P.Passive.1@@P.Negation.1@@P.Mode.Yes@@D.Person@@D.Mode.Dub@+VTA+Cnj+ThmPas+Neg+1+Pl+Prt:@D.Person@@P.Passive.1@@P.Negation.1@@P.Mode.Yes@@D.Person@@D.Mode.Dub@m%>%>igooc1%>siiw%>aangi%>b1an2%>%>i1 #;
